Georgia, session 2025_26, HB270.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
This Act shall be known and may be cited as the "Eviction Service and Airplane Evictions
Act."
SECTION 2.
Article 7 of Chapter 10 of Title 9 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to
continuances, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
H. B. 270
- 1 -

LC 48 1433
"9-10-170.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term 'airport' means the real and personal property
constituting a publicly funded airport and the management, operation, or control of an
airport as a complete entity or unit.
(b)(1)(A) A tenant of an airport involved in a dispossessory proceeding for any reason,
except for nonpayment of rent, pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 7 of Title 44 that leases
space from an airport shall, upon the filing of a complaint under 14 C.F.R. Part 13 or
Part 16, be granted a continuance and stay of such proceeding until 30 days after the
resolution of such complaint.
(B) Any tenant granted a continuance and stay pursuant to this Code section shall
continue to pay rent to the landlord during such continuance and stay; provided,
however, that the landlord's acceptance of such rent shall not waive such landlord's
rights under Article 3 of Chapter 7 of Title 44 or otherwise.
(2) A continuance and stay granted pursuant to this Code section shall apply to all
aspects of the case, including, but not limited to, the filing and serving of an answer to
a complaint; the making of any discovery or motion; any response to any subpoena,
discovery, or motion; and appearance at any hearing, trial, or argument.
(3) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, rule of court, or administrative rule or
regulation, the time for doing any act in the case which is delayed by the continuance and
stay provided by this Code section shall be automatically extended by the same length of
time as the continuance or stay covered."
SECTION 3.
Code Section 44-7-51 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to issuance of
summons, service, time for answer, and defenses and counterclaims, is amended by revising
subsection (a) as follows:
H. B. 270
- 2 -

LC 48 1433
"(a) When the affidavit provided for in Code Section 44-7-50 is made, the judge of the
superior court, the state court, or any other court with jurisdiction over the subject matter
or the judge, clerk, or deputy clerk of the magistrate court shall grant and issue a summons
to the sheriff or his or her deputy, or to any lawful constable of the county where the land
is located, or an approved process server. A copy of the summons and a copy of the
affidavit shall be personally served upon the defendant. If the sheriff, constable, or
approved process server is unable to serve the defendant personally, service may be had
by delivering the summons and the affidavit to any person who is sui juris residing on the
premises or, if after reasonable effort no such person is found residing on the premises, by
posting a copy of the summons and the affidavit on the door of the premises and, on the
same day of such posting, by enclosing, directing, stamping, and mailing by first-class mail
a copy of the summons and the affidavit to the defendant at his or her last known address,
if any, and making an entry of this action on the affidavit filed in the case."
SECTION 4.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 270
- 3 -